West Virginia, session 2026, HB5244.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia:ARTICLE 3D. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT INITIATIVE§18B-3D-9. Learn and Earn Pilot Program for state baccalaureate institutions.(a) The Legislature finds that the baccalaureate state colleges and universities, including the statutorily and administratively exempted schools, but excluding the West Virginia School of Osteopathic Medicine, would benefit from participation in the Learn and Earn Program set forth in §18B-3D-1 et seq.(b) Therefore, the chancellor, under the direction of the council, in coordination with the commission and the baccalaureate institutions, will develop, implement, and administer the two-year Learn and Earn Pilot Program for the baccalaureate institutions beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, and continue through the 2027-2028 school year, in accordance with §18B-3D-1 et seq. and the rules promulgated thereto by the Council.(c) Moneys appropriated or otherwise available for the Learn and Earn Pilot Program shall be allocated by line item to an appropriate account and kept separate from moneys allocated to the Learn and Earn Program for the community and technical colleges. Any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of the fiscal year are carried forward for use in the next fiscal year. Nothing in this section requires a specific level of appropriation by the Legislature. The council may allocate a reasonable amount, not to exceed five percent of the funds available for the Learn and Earn Pilot Program on an annual basis, for general program administration.